Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4134.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 13n. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 333 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 333.10116(1) Pub ord E Purchasing or selling body part of deceased individual for transplantation or therapy 5 333.10117 Pub ord E Falsifying, concealing, or defacing document of anatomical gift for financial gain 5 333.10204(1) Pub ord F Transferring a human organ for valuable consideration 4 333.10204(4) Pub saf F Removal of a human organ by an unauthorized individual 4 333.10205 Pub saf F Removal of a human organ in an unapproved facility 4 333.13738(2) Pub saf F Waste disposal violations ? subsequent offense 5 333.13738(3) Pub saf F Improper disposal of waste with indifference to human life 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Pub saf B Improper disposal of waste with extreme indifference to human life 20 333.16170(3) Pub trst F False representation of completion of health professional recovery program 4 333.16213a(3) Pub trst G Medical record ? intentional omission of certain medical services ? health professional 2 333.16279(5)(a) Person G Performing certain medical treatment on a minor ? first offense 2 333.16279(5)(b) Person E Performing certain medical treatment on a minor ? subsequent offense 5 333.16294 Pub saf F Unauthorized practice of health profession 4 333.17748d(2) Person G Compounding pharmacy violation 2 333.17748d(3) Person F Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in personal injury 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 333.17748d(4) Person E Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in serious impairment of a body function 5 333.17748d(5) Person C Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in death 15 333.17764(3) Pub saf G Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device 2 333.17764(4) Pub saf F Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in personal injury 4 333.17764(5) Pub saf E Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in serious impairment of a body function 5 333.17764(6) Pub saf C Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in death 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.17766c(2)(b) CS G Possessing more than 12 grams ephedrine or pseudoephedrine 2 333.17766c(2)(c) CS E Purchasing or possessing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine knowing or having reason to know that it is to be used to manufacture methamphetamine 5 333.20142(5) Pub trst F False statement in application for licensure as health facility 4 333.20153 Pub saf D Reuse of single-use medical device 10 333.20175b(3) Pub trst G Medical record ? intentional omission of certain medical services ? health facility or agency 2 333.21792 Pub trst G Nursing home accepting referral fees, bribing officials, or accepting bribes 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.26424(l) Pub trst G Selling marihuana in violation of registry identification card restrictions 2 333.26153(4) Person G Interfering with access to health facility ? second or subsequent offense 3 333.26153(6) Person H Interfering with access to health facility by nonviolent physical obstruction ? second or subsequent offense 1 year and 6 months 333.26153(7) Person D Interfering with access to health facility causing bodily injury 10 333.26153(8) Person A Interfering with access to health facility causing death Life 333.27407a(c) Pub saf F Operating medical marihuana facility without a license resulting in death or serious injury 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect 1 2 3 unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01706'25) or House Bill No. 4133 (request no. H01706'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.